District of Columbia statutes.
48-904.05

Effect of acquittal or conviction under federal law.

No person shall be prosecuted for a violation of any provision of this chapter if such person has been acquitted or convicted under any United States statute governing the sale or distribution of controlled substances of the same act or omission which is alleged to constitute a violation of this chapter.

History

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 405, 28 DCR 3081

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-545.